Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.055

Grain dealer—Exempt grain dealers—License fees—Penalty.

An application for a license to operate as a grain dealer shall be accompanied by a license fee of one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars. The license fee for exempt grain dealers shall be five hundred dollars.

If an application for renewal of a grain dealer or exempt grain dealer license is not received by the department before the renewal date or dates established by the director by rule, a penalty of fifty dollars for the first week and one hundred dollars for each week thereafter shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license may be issued. This penalty does not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or she has not acted as a grain dealer or exempt grain dealer after the expiration of his or her prior license.

[ 2012 c 123 s 2; 2011 c 336 s 603; 1997 c 303 s 7; 1994 c 46 s 5; 1991 c 109 s 26; 1988 c 95 s 1; 1986 c 203 s 14; 1983 c 305 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 303 ss 6 and 7: See note following RCW 22.09.050.

Findings—1997 c 303: See note following RCW 43.135.055.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.